Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission

171.800.
Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission — Members — Officers — Meetings — Funding — Program established.

The Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission is hereby established to perform the functions specified in KRS

171.805

.

The membership of the commission shall consist of three (3) ex officio members and seventeen (17) members who derive from geographically diverse areas of the state and who represent various heritage interests as follows:

The secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, or the secretary’s designee to serve ex officio;

The president of Kentucky State University, or the president’s designee to serve ex officio;

The director of the Kentucky Heritage Council, or the director’s designee to serve ex officio;

Four (4) members from institutions of higher education;

One (1) member from the preservation community;

One (1) member from the arts community; and

Eleven (11) members from the public-at-large.

Appointed members shall be appointed by the Governor and shall serve for terms of four (4) years. Any vacancies shall be filled by appointment of the Governor for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Commission members shall receive no compensation for their services but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

From the commission membership, the Governor shall appoint a chairman and a vice chairman of the commission. The commission may elect by majority vote other officers deemed necessary.

The commission shall meet at the call of the chairman, but not less often than three times during each calendar year. A majority of the members appointed to the commission shall constitute a quorum.

The commission shall be attached to the Kentucky Heritage Council for administrative purposes.

The commission may accept grants or raise funds from any available source, public or private, to accomplish its duties and responsibilities. Committees may be formed at the discretion of the chairman.

The African-American Heritage Program is established as a branch within the Kentucky Heritage Division, whose responsibilities shall include providing staff services needed to perform its duties under KRS

171.805

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 241, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2009, ch. 16, § 47, effective June 25, 2009.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

171.805.
Purpose of commission — Duties and functions.

The Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission shall be dedicated to the preservation and protection of all meaningful vestiges of Kentucky’s African-American heritage.

The duties and functions of the commission shall be to:

Advise the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet and agencies within the cabinet on matters relating to African-American heritage;

Encourage other public and private agencies within the areas of the arts, the humanities, and the sciences to incorporate the African-American influence when developing programs on the history and heritage of Kentucky;

Represent a network of groups and individuals interested or involved in promoting awareness of African-American heritage in Kentucky;

Advocate the preservation, conservation, and interpretation of significant buildings, sites, neighborhoods, documents, artifacts, and lifeways that represent and embody African-American heritage;

Recognize and sanction projects which advance wider knowledge of African-Americans’ impact on life in Kentucky; and

Coordinate an initiative to protect, preserve, and promote the history of the Underground Railroad in Kentucky, in accordance with KRS

171.812

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 241, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2003, ch. 11, § 4, effective June 24, 2003; 2006, ch. 211, § 112, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 16, § 48, effective June 25, 2009.

171.810.
Definitions for KRS 171.810 to 171.814.

As used in KRS

171.810

to

171.814

:

“Commission” means the Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission.

“Underground Railroad” means the escape of African-American slaves from or through Kentucky.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 11, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2017 ch. 80, § 14, effective June 29, 2017.

171.812.
Underground Railroad initiative.

The commission shall coordinate Kentucky’s Underground Railroad initiative in accordance with KRS

171.805

. The commission’s duties as they relate to this initiative shall include but not be limited to the following:

Undertake a comprehensive statewide inventory of historic sites related to the Underground Railroad, and implement a master plan for site protection and development;

Encourage and assist the state preservation officer within the Kentucky Heritage Council to nominate significant historical sites of the Kentucky Underground Railroad to the national and state registers of historic places;

Develop and operate, in conjunction with the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, a program of public information, education, and promotion of the history of the Underground Railroad in Kentucky, to include but not be limited to implementing and maintaining a Web site connected to the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet;

Coordinate with local, state, and federal authorities in project planning that may affect Underground Railroad sites in Kentucky and neighboring states;

Present to the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet an annual report and plan for future action; and

Pursue public and private funds to carry out the duties set forth in this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 11, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 95, § 37, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 49, effective June 25, 2009; 2017 ch. 80, § 15, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

171.814.
Underground Railroad Advisory Council — Members — Duties — Meetings. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 11, § 3, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 95, § 38, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 211, § 113, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 57, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 16, § 50, effective June 25, 2009; 2015 ch. 69, § 12, effective June 24, 2015; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

171.816.
Duties of Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet relating to history of Underground Railroad in Kentucky — Annual report.

The Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall be charged with the purpose of protecting, preserving, and promoting the history of the Underground Railroad in Kentucky in accordance with KRS

171.805

and

171.810

to

171.812

. The secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall receive an annual report from the Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission in accordance with KRS

171.812

(5), and shall review and submit the annual report to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission for distribution to the appropriate committees.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 11, § 5, effective June 24, 2003; 2006, ch. 211, § 114, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 16, § 51, effective June 25, 2009; 2017 ch. 80, § 16, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/24/2003). Although 2003 Ky. Acts ch. 11,sec. 5, indicated that this section was to be codified as a new section of KRS Chapter 12, the statute has been placed in KRS Chapter 171 because, given the subject matter of the section, KRS Chapter 171 is the more logical placement. See KRS

7.136

.